dev/verb/verb.ne.dix
  <!-- अपनाई; अपनाई; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अपनाई__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अपनाउ; अपनाउ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="अपनाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ँदा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जमाउ; जमाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जमाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पसे; पसे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पसे__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टार्; टार्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टार्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भट्टयाउ; भट्टयाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भट्टयाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धकेल्; धकेल्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="धकेल्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भइ; भइ; 3 -->
    <pardef n="भइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सक्दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>रहने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लिएँ; लिएँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लिएँ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बुझ्; बुझ; 15 -->
    <pardef n="बुझ/्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्न</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नु</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दो</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दै</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दा</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ने</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>े</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाएँ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्यौ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्छस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िनस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="prft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्नोस्</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="pol"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्दिन</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िन्छ</l>
          <r>्<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भए; भए; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भए__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="mf"/><s n="fam"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछ्याउ; पछ्याउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछ्याउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दिनुप; दिनुप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दिनुप__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>र्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वीउ; वीउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वीउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="impers"/><s n="fam"/><s n="imp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हुनु; हुनु; 5 -->
    <pardef n="हुनु__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुँदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुदो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>पर्ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुन्थ्यो</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pol"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>हुन्छ</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="smpl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="infml"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लेखाउ; लेखाउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लेखाउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ओछ्याउ; ओछ्याउ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ओछ्याउ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- डाक्; डाक्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="डाक्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पस्; पस्; 3 -->
    <pardef n="पस्__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दै</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दा</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppd"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फुका; फुका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फुका__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उने</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जगाइ; जगाइ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जगाइ__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>दिनु</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppe"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="अपनाई"><i>अपनाई</i><par n="अपनाई__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="अपनाउ"><i>अपनाउ</i><par n="अपनाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जमाउ"><i>जमाउ</i><par n="जमाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पसे"><i>पसे</i><par n="पसे__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="टार्"><i>टार्</i><par n="टार्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भट्टयाउ"><i>भट्टयाउ</i><par n="भट्टयाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="धकेल्"><i>धकेल्</i><par n="धकेल्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भइ"><i>भइ</i><par n="भइ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लिएँ"><i>लिएँ</i><par n="लिएँ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="बुझ्"><i>बुझ</i><par n="बुझ/्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="भए"><i>भए</i><par n="भए__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पछ्याउ"><i>पछ्याउ</i><par n="पछ्याउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="दिनुप"><i>दिनुप</i><par n="दिनुप__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="वीउ"><i>वीउ</i><par n="वीउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="हुनु"><i>हुनु</i><par n="हुनु__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="लेखाउ"><i>लेखाउ</i><par n="लेखाउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ओछ्याउ"><i>ओछ्याउ</i><par n="ओछ्याउ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="डाक्"><i>डाक्</i><par n="डाक्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="पस्"><i>पस्</i><par n="पस्__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="फुका"><i>फुका</i><par n="फुका__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="जगाइ"><i>जगाइ</i><par n="जगाइ__vblex"/></e>
